Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.110

Application of award.

A state financial aid recipient under this chapter shall apply the award toward the cost of tuition, room, board, books, and fees at the institution of higher education attended. An opportunity internship graduate who enters an apprenticeship program may use the award for the costs of related and supplemental instruction provided through an institution of higher education, tools, and other costs associated with the apprenticeship program.

[ 2009 c 238 s 10; 2004 c 275 s 40; 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 16. Formerly RCW 28B.10.816, 28.76.500.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 238: See note following RCW 28C.18.160.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.